Maryland, session 2025, HB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–205.
(a) In this section, “state of good repair needs” includes the capital needs
identified by the Administration in the assessment required under § 7–309 of this article.
(b) For fiscal year 2020, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration
that is equal to the appropriation for the operation of the Administration in the fiscal year
2019 State budget as introduced, increased by at least 4.4%.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1463*

HOUSE BILL 1463
(c) For fiscal year 2021, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration
that is equal to the appropriation for the operation of the Administration in the State
budget for the immediately preceding fiscal year, increased by at least 4.4%.
(d) For each of fiscal years 2023 through [2029] 2039, the Governor shall include
in the State budget an appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation
of the Administration that may not be less than the fiscal year 2022 appropriation for the
operation of the Administration.
(e) For fiscal year 2022, the Governor shall include in the State budget an
appropriation from the Transportation Trust Fund for the operation of the Administration
that may not be less than the fiscal year 2021 appropriation for the operation of the
Administration.
(f) (1) For each of fiscal years 2020 through 2022, the Governor shall include
in the State budget an appropriation for the capital needs of the Administration of at least
$29,100,000 from the revenues available for the State capital program in the
Transportation Trust Fund.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Governor shall include
in the State budget an appropriation for the state of good repair needs of the Administration
in the following amounts from the revenues available for the State capital program in the
Transportation Trust Fund:
(i) For fiscal year 2023, at least $402,037,183;
(ii) For fiscal year 2024, at least $502,081,501;
(iii) For EACH OF fiscal [year] YEARS 2025 THROUGH 2028, at least
$450,000,000;
(iv) [For fiscal year 2026, at least $450,000,000;
(v) For fiscal year 2027, at least $450,000,000;
(vi) For fiscal year 2028, at least $450,000,000; and
(vii)] For fiscal year 2029, at least $318,558,000; AND
(V) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2030 THROUGH 2039, AT LEAST
$550,000,000.
(3) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, an appropriation
required under paragraph (2) of this subsection may be reduced if the total appropriation

HOUSE BILL 1463 3
for state of good repair needs in a prior fiscal year exceeded the amount specified under
paragraph (2) of this subsection for that fiscal year.
(ii) A reduction authorized under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph:
1. May be applied only to one fiscal year; and
2. May not exceed the difference between the total
appropriation for state of good repair needs for the prior fiscal year and the amount
specified under paragraph (2) of this subsection for that fiscal year.
(4) (i) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may not supplant any other capital funding otherwise available for the
Administration.
(ii) The appropriations required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection shall be in addition to any funds appropriated for the capital planning,
engineering, right–of–way acquisition, or construction of the Purple Line in Montgomery
County and Prince George’s County.
(g) This Act may not be construed to limit the authority of the Administrator to
use available funds appropriated to the Administration to increase the State investment in
locally operated transit agencies.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.